California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department coordinate with the United States Department of Agriculture, the federal Food and Drug Administration, and the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to implement the expanded antimicrobial resistance surveillance efforts included in the National Action Plan for Combating Antibiotic-Resistant Bacteria, and that the information gathered through this effort will help lead to a better understanding of the links between antimicrobial use patterns in livestock and the development of antimicrobial resistant bacterial infections.

(b) (1) The department shall gather information on medically important antimicrobial
 drug sales and usage, as well as antimicrobial resistant bacteria and livestock management practice data. Monitoring efforts shall not be duplicative of the National Animal Health Monitoring System and the National Antimicrobial Resistance Monitoring System, and, to the extent feasible, the department shall coordinate with the United States Department of Agriculture, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and the federal Food and Drug Administration in the development of these efforts.

(2) In coordinating with the National Animal Health Monitoring System and the National Antimicrobial Resistant Monitoring System, the department shall gather representative samples from all of the following:

(A) California’s major livestock segments.

(B) Regions with considerable livestock production.

(C) Representative segments of the food production chain.

(c) The department shall work with willing participants to gather samples and shall consult with, and conduct outreach to, livestock producers, licensed veterinarians, and any other relevant stakeholders on the implementation of the monitoring efforts. Participation in this effort shall be done in a manner that does not breach veterinary-client-patient confidentiality laws.

(d) (1) The department shall report to the Legislature by January 1, 2019, the results of its outreach activities and monitoring efforts. The department shall advise the Legislature as to whether or not participation is sufficient to provide statistically relevant data. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) This subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(e) The department shall seek funds from federal, state, and other sources to implement this section.

(f) The department may promulgate regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14406.

The department has the authority to request and receive copies of veterinary feed directives from the livestock owner, veterinarian, or distributor to fully implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14407.

Notwithstanding the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), any information provided pursuant to this chapter and Section 14902.5 shall be held confidential, and shall not be disclosed to any person or governmental agency, other than the department or the Veterinary Medical Board, for the purposes of enforcing the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), unless the data is aggregated to prevent the identification of an individual farm or business. Information may be shared with federal agencies so long as it is protected by the federal Confidential Information Protection and Statistical Efficiency
 Act of 2002 (Public Law 107-347).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 123.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14408.

(a) A person who violates this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) for each day a violation occurs.

(b) (1) For a second or subsequent violation, a person who violates this chapter shall be punishable by an administrative fine, levied by the secretary, in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for each day a violation occurs.

(2) In addition to the administrative fine, the violator shall attend an educational program on the judicious use of medically important antimicrobial drugs that has been approved by the secretary. The violator shall successfully
 complete the program and provide proof to the secretary within 90 days from the occurrence of the violation.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to licensed veterinarians. If the Veterinary Medical Board determines that a veterinarian is in violation of the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), the veterinarian may be subject to disciplinary sanctions pursuant to the act.

(d) The moneys collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be available for expenditure upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Fertilizing Materials [14501. - 14682.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14501. - 14505.]

14501.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of this chapter to do all of the following:

(a) To promote the distribution of effective and safe fertilizing materials essential for the production of food and fiber.

(b) To provide assurance to the consumer of commercial fertilizers, agricultural minerals, and beneficial substances that the product purchased is properly identified, and to provide assurance of the validity of the quality and quantity represented by the manufacturer of these products.

(c) To provide funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.

The secretary shall enforce this chapter and adopt and enforce regulations relating to the manufacture, guaranteeing, labeling, and distribution of, the manner of reporting tonnage for, and making inspection tonnage fee payments upon, fertilizing materials as the secretary determines necessary to carry out this chapter. A copy of those regulations shall be made available promptly upon adoption to each person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter. The failure of any licensee to receive a copy of the regulations is not a defense to a violation of the regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.1.

The secretary shall notify every licensee that manufactures, distributes, or sells ammonium nitrate, as defined in Section 14512.5, of their duty to maintain records pursuant to Section 14612.5 and to notify the secretary as to where those records may be obtained by him or her.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.

Any money which is received by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, to be expended solely for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.

The secretary shall prepare an annual statement of the operating expenditures and revenue related to this chapter which shall be presented to the board for review as soon as possible following the termination of the fiscal year. A copy of this statement shall be made available to any interested person upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14505.

Agricultural products derived from municipal sewage sludge shall be regulated as a fertilizing material pursuant to this chapter, and when used in general commerce, these products are not subject to regulation as a hazardous substance pursuant to Section 108130) of the Health and Safety Code and are not subject to regulation as a waste under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 54.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [14511. - 14564.]

14511.

“Agricultural liming materials” are agricultural minerals composed of calcium or magnesium compounds, or both, which are capable of neutralizing soil acidity and which are distributed in this state for that purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.

“Agricultural mineral” means any substance with nitrogen (N), available phosphoric acid (P2O5), and soluble potash (K2O), singly or in combination, in amounts less than 5 percent which is distributed for farm use, or any substance only containing recognized essential secondary nutrients or micronutrients in amounts equal or greater than minimum amounts specified by the director, by regulation, and distributed in this state as a source of these nutrients for the purpose of promoting plant growth. It shall include gypsum, liming materials, manure, wood fly ash, sewage sludge not qualifying as commercial fertilizer, and captured dilute solutions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.5.

“Ammonium nitrate” means solid ammonium nitrate that is chiefly the ammonium salt of nitric acid, contains not less than 33 percent of nitrogen, one-half of which is in the ammonium form and one-half of which is in the nitrate form, and is produced, imported, stored, offered for sale, sold, offered for distribution, received, or intended for use as a plant nutrient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.

“Beneficial substance” means any substance or compound, other than primary plant nutrients, secondary plant nutrients, and micronutrients, and excluding pesticides, that can be demonstrated by scientific research to be beneficial to one or more species of plants, soil, or media. A beneficial substance includes, but is not limited to, plant biostimulants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 78.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.5.

“Biochar” means materials derived from thermochemical conversion of biomass in an oxygen-limited environment containing at least 60 percent carbon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 331, Sec. 2.   (AB 2511)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14514.

“Biotics” means all materials for which claims are made relating to organisms, enzymes, or organism by-products.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14515.

“Board” means the Fertilizer Inspection Advisory Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14516.

“Brand” means any term, design, or trademark used in connection with a fertilizing material product.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14517.

“Bulk material” means fertilizing materials distributed in nonpackaged form or in a container containing more than 50 kilograms or 110 pounds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14518.

“Business location” means any place where fertilizing materials are sold or stored for later sale, except storage of package materials on premises operated exclusively as a public warehouse.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14519.

“Captured dilute solutions” means solutions that contain low levels of plant nutrients as a result of equipment rinsing and runoff.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14520.

“Chelates” means compounds, usually organic, which can combine with a metal ion and form a ring structure between a portion of the chelating agent molecule and the metal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14521.

“Chelated plant nutrients” means compounds of metallic secondary nutrients and micronutrients with organic chelating agents which have the property of being available under pH conditions in which the nutrients normally form insoluble compounds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14522.

“Commercial fertilizer” means any substance which contains 5 percent or more of nitrogen (N), available phosphoric acid (P2O5), or soluble potash (K2O), singly or collectively, which is distributed in this state for promoting or stimulating plant growth. “Commercial fertilizer” includes both agricultural and specialty fertilizers. “Specialty fertilizers” may contain less than 5 percent nitrogen (N), available phosphoric acid (P2O5), or soluble potash (K2O), singly or collectively.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14523.

“Common carrier” means a company licensed with the Public Utilities Commission that hauls for hire.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14524.

“Complex” means bonding which includes both of the following:

(a) “Natural organic complexes” means organic by-products of the wood pulp and other industries, such as the lignin sulfonates and polyflavinoids, that form complexes with metallic secondary nutrients and micronutrients. “Natural organic complexes” do not include synthetic chelates in that natural organic complex, generally known as the natural organic chelates which are polymers, for which the nature of the metallic bonding is not known.

(b) “Inorganic complexes” include inorganic cations which form coordinate chemical bonds with other inorganic cations, anions, or neutral molecules, such as where metal-ammonia complexes of zinc or ammonia are coordinately bonded to the metal cation, and which usually reacts differently than the metal alone in solutions, but dissociates in soil and reacts as the uncomplexed cation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14525.

“Compost” means a biologically stable material derived from the composting process.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14526.

“Composting” means the biological decomposition of organic matter which inhibits pathogens, viable weed seeds, and odors. “Composting” may be accomplished by mixing and piling in a way as to promote aerobic or anaerobic decay, or both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14527.

“Derivation statement” means the sources of all guaranteed primary nutrients or secondary nutrients, or both, and micronutrients.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14528.

“Discontinued manufacturing” means a beneficial substance, packaged agricultural mineral, organic input material, and specialty fertilizer that is no longer manufactured, but is still offered for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 5.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14529.

“Distribute” means to sell, offer, expose for sale, exchange, barter, or otherwise supply products for use in, or shipment within or into, this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14530.

“Distributor” means any person who imports or consigns a fertilizing material or who offers for sale, sells, barters, or othewise supplies this product for use in, or shipment within or into, this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14531.

“Experimental use” means any application of a fertilizing material which is not offered for sale, has no commercial value, and is for the sole purpose of obtaining scientific data.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14532.

“Farm use” means that the fertilizing material is used primarily for application to crops produced for commercial value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (AB 856)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14533.

“Fertilizing material” means any commercial fertilizer, agricultural mineral, beneficial substance, or organic input material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 6.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14534.

“Fish emulsion” means fertilizing material from which the guaranteed nutrients are derived primarily from fish, which contains a minimum of 40 percent total solids from fish, and which may contain additional sources of nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash for standardization purposes or stabilization purposes, or for both purposes, that shall be included in the required guaranteed analysis and derivation statement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14535.

“Grade” means the percentage of total nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash stated in the same terms, order, and percentage as the guaranteed analysis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14536.

“Guaranteed analysis” means the minimum percentage of primary or secondary plant nutrients or micronutrients, or both, claimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14537.

(a) “Gypsum” means calcium sulfate dihydrate, a mineral used in the fertilizer industry as a source of calcium and sulfur which is also known as landplaster.

(b) “Phosphatic sulfate gypsum” means a by-product of calcium dihydrate from the manufacture of phosphoric acid, also known as phosphogypsum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14538.

“Hydroponics” means a system in which water soluble primary or secondary plant nutrients or micronutrients, or combination thereof, are placed in intimate contact with the plant’s root system, being grown in a water or an inert supportive medium which supplies physical support for the roots but which does not add or subtract primary or secondary plant nutrients or micronutrients, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14539.

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variation inherent in the taking, preparation, and analysis of an official sample of fertilizing materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14540.

“Label” means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter on the immediate container of, or a statement, including the guaranteed analysis, accompanying fertilizing material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14541.

“Label guarantor” means the manufacturer’s or person’s name appearing on the label of a fertilizing material.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14542.

“Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter on, accompanying, or used in promoting the sale of any fertilizing material, including advertisements, brochures, posters, internet websites, and television and radio announcements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 7.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14543.

“Licensee” means a person who has obtained a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14544.

“Manufacturer” means a person who produces, sells, or distributes a fertilizing material in this state that bears their company name on the label and is the guarantor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14545.

“Manure” means any substances composed primarily of animal excrement, plant remains, or mixtures of those substances.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14546.

“Micronutrients” means boron, chlorine, cobalt, copper, iron, manganese, molybdenum, sodium, or zinc, alone or in any combination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14547.

“Mixed fertilizer” is a commercial fertilizer containing any combination or mixture of fertilizing materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14548.

“Natural organic fertilizer” means materials derived from either plant or animal products containing one or more nutrients other than carbon, hydrogen, and oxygen, which are essential for plant growth, which may be subjected to biological degradation processes under normal conditions of aging, rainfall, sun-curing, air drying, composting, rotting, enzymatic, or anaerobic/aerobic bacterial action, or any combination of these, which shall not be mixed with synthetic materials or changed in any physical or chemical manner from their initial state except by physical manipulations such as drying, cooking, chopping, grinding, shredding, or pelleting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.

“Noncommercial use” means materials used primarily for application to lawns, shrubbery, flowers, trees, or where there is no crop for commercial value or economic purpose, excluding golf courses, cemeteries, and nurseries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14550.

“Official sample” means any sample of fertilizing material taken by an agent of the department and designated as “official” by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14550.5.

“Organic input material” means any bulk or packaged commercial fertilizer, agricultural mineral, beneficial substance, or specialty fertilizer, excluding pesticides, that is to be used in organic crop and food production and that complies with the requirements of the National Organic Program standards, as specified in Part 205 (commencing with Section 205.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle B of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 8.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.

“Packaged” means a fertilizing material distributed in packaged form or in a container containing equal to or less than 50 kilograms or 110 pounds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14553.

“Percent or percentage” means percentage by weight.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14554.

“Person” means individual, partnership, association, firm, limited liability company, or corporation who assumes responsibility for the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14555.

“Plant” means any business location where fertilizing materials are manufactured, sold, or stored for later sale, except storage of packaged materials on premises operated exclusively as a public warehouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14555.5.

“Plant biostimulant” means a substance or microorganism, or mixtures thereof, that, when applied to seeds, plants, the rhizosphere, soil, or other growth media, act to support a plant’s natural nutrition processes independently of the biostimulant’s nutrient content. The plant biostimulant thereby may improve nutrient availability, uptake, or use efficiency, tolerance to abiotic stress, and consequent growth, development, quality, or yield.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 10.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14556.

“Primary plant nutrient” means nitrogen (N), available phosphoric acid (P2O5), or soluble potash (K2O).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14557.

“Provisional registration” means that under certain circumstances, a label for renewal on a beneficial substance, packaged agricultural mineral, organic input material, or specialty fertilizer, alone or in any combination, may be registered for a limited period of time while labels are being corrected and reprinted or during registration renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 11.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14558.

“Registrant” means any person who has registered a packaged agricultural mineral, beneficial substance, organic input material, or specialty fertilizer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 12.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14559.

“Secondary plant nutrient” means calcium, magnesium, or sulfur, alone or in any combination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14559.5.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14560.

“Sewage sludge” means the solid material resulting from the treatment of waste water of residential or municipal sewage systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14561.

“Soil conditioners” means polyelectrolytes, such as complex vinyl and acrylic compounds and certain cellulose and lignin derivatives, which tend to agglomerate soil colloids and produce a crumb structure in the soil and increase the permeability of the soil to air and water and increase its resistance to crusting when it dries out.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14562.

“Soilless growing medium” means a medium of an inorganic substance, such as sand or gravel, or in a soilless organic material such as sphagnum peat or pine bark, and periodically watered with a primary or secondary plant nutrient or micronutrient solution, or both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14563.

“Specialty fertilizer” means packaged commercial fertilizer labeled for home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, and other similar noncommercial uses. These products may contain less than 5 percent nitrogen (N), available phosphoric acid (P2O5), or soluble potash (K2 O), singly or collectively, detectable by chemical methods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14564.

“Ton” means a net weight of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fertilizer Inspection Advisory Board [14581. - 14586.]

14581.

There is, in the department, a Fertilizer Inspection Advisory Board consisting of nine persons appointed by the secretary, eight of whom shall be licensed under this chapter and subject to the payment of the inspection fee in accordance with this chapter, and one of whom shall be a public member. The members of the board shall receive no compensation, but are entitled to payment of necessary traveling expenses in accordance with the rules of the Department of Human Resources. These expenses shall be paid out of appropriations made to the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 19.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14582.

The term of office of a member of the board is three years. The initial board shall consist of, three members appointed for a term of three years, three members appointed for a term of two years, and three members appointed for a term of one year. Thereafter, appointments shall be for full three-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled for the duration of an unexpired term.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14583.

The board shall be advisory to the secretary and may make recommendations on all matters pertaining to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the inspection and enforcement program, research and education, the annual budget, necessary fees to provide adequate inspection services, and regulations required to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14583.5.

(a) The secretary, by January 1, 2012, and in consultation with the board, shall review the definition of organic input materials in Section 14550.5 and identify oversight and implementation issues that may arise or have arisen on account of that definition. The review shall also include an examination of materials not currently regulated under this definition that may warrant oversight by the department so as to protect the state’s agricultural industry, including the organic industry, and recommendations for any necessary statutory changes.

(b) The secretary shall post the review required pursuant to subdivision (a) in a report on the Internet Web site of the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 257, Sec. 7.   (AB 856)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14584.

The board shall elect a chairperson and other officers as it deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14585.

The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson or the secretary, or at the request of any five members of the board. The board shall meet at least once a year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14586.

The secretary shall accept the recommendations of the advisory board pertaining to subdivision (b) of Section 14611 if he or she finds them to be practicable and in the interests of the fertilizer industry and the public. If the secretary does not accept the recommendations of the advisory board, or any part thereof, the secretary shall provide the board with a written statement within 15 working days of making his or her decision stating the reasons for not accepting the recommendations, or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 490, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licensing [14591. - 14593.]

14591.

(a) Every person who manufactures or distributes fertilizing materials shall, before engaging in the activity, obtain a license from the secretary for each plant and business location that the person operates. Before issuing a license, the secretary shall require verification that the applicant is a manufacturer or distributor of fertilizing material compliant with this chapter. All licenses shall be renewed in January of each odd-numbered year, and shall be valid until December 31 of the following even-numbered year, if issued in January of that same year. However, a person who only distributes or who makes retail sales of packaged agricultural minerals, packaged commercial fertilizers, organic input material, or packaged beneficial substances, alone or in any combination, which bear the registered label of another licensed
 person, is not required to obtain the license.

(b) Every person who manufactures or distributes, or intends to manufacture or distribute, ammonium nitrate as defined in Section 14512.5, in this state, shall inform the secretary of that activity or intent when applying for a license. The license obtained by that person shall identify that person as a manufacturer or distributor of ammonium nitrate.

(c) The license fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300). The secretary may, based on the findings and recommendations of the board, reduce the license fee to a lower rate that provides sufficient revenue to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 13.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14592.

A violation of this article is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). A second or subsequent violation of this article is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14593.

The license shall expire on December 31, of an even-numbered year. Each application for renewal shall be accompanied by a fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for each plant or business location which a person operates. If a license is not renewed within one calendar month following expiration, a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) shall be added to the fee and an additional penalty of fifty dollars ($50) shall be added for each succeeding calendar month the business location remains unlicensed. The total penalty, however, shall not exceed 100 percent of the original amount due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 461, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Registration [14601. - 14604.]

14601.

(a) Each differing label, other than weight or package size, such as changes in the guaranteed analysis, derivation statement, or anything that implies a different product, for specialty fertilizer, packaged agricultural mineral, beneficial substance, and organic input material shall be registered. The department may develop a schedule for all registrations to be submitted to the department for approval, and registrations shall be valid for up to four years. The registration fee shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400) per product, except for organic input material.

(b) (1) Any substance distributed for the purpose of promoting plant growth or improving the quality of crops by conditioning soils solely through physical means or that is
 intended for use solely because of its physical properties shall not require registration if distributed in bulk quantities, excluding organic input material and biochar.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, those bulk materials include, but are not limited to, hay, straw, sand, wood products, manures, and compost sold without guarantees for plant nutrients.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the registration fee for organic input material shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per product, as the registration of organic input material labels require additional departmental resources and review time to ensure that nutrient guarantees and claims are scientifically feasible and meet National Organic Program standards. Funds generated from the registration of organic input material shall be deposited into the Organic Input Materials Account in the Department of Food and
 Agriculture Fund and, notwithstanding Section 221, shall be available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(d) The secretary may, based on the findings and recommendations of the board, reduce the registration fees to a lower rate that provides sufficient revenue to carry out this chapter.

(e) Registrations may not be issued without a current license.

(f) The secretary may require proof of labeling statements and other claims made for any specialty fertilizer, agricultural mineral, organic input material, or beneficial substance, before the secretary registers any such product. As evidence of proof, the secretary may rely on experimental data, evaluations, or advice furnished by scientists, including scientists affiliated with the University of California, and may accept or reject additional sources of proof in the
 evaluation of any fertilizing material. In all cases, experimental proof shall relate to conditions in California under which the product is intended for use.

(g) The secretary may perform site inspections of organic input material manufacturing processes used to validate label nutrient guarantees, claims, and compliance with National Organic Program standards giving priority to inspecting high-risk products and manufacturers. The department may accept inspections performed by a third-party organization approved by the secretary for organic input material manufacturers. All inspection records obtained by a contracted third-party organization shall be made available to the secretary upon request. When a contracted third-party organization is conducting a site inspection, the organization shall notify the department of when the inspection is going to take place no less than 72 hours in advance of the inspection. Department representatives may be
 present at the inspection.

(h) (1) The secretary, after hearing, may cancel the registration of, or refuse to register, any specialty fertilizer, packaged soil amendment, organic input material, or beneficial substance, that the secretary determines is detrimental or injurious to plants, animals, public safety, or the environment when it is applied as directed, that is known to be of little or no value for the purpose for which it is intended, or for which any false or misleading claim is made or implied. The secretary may cancel the registration of any product of any person who violates this chapter.

(2) The proceedings to determine whether to cancel or refuse registration of any of those products shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The secretary shall have all
 the powers that are granted pursuant to Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 208, Sec. 14.   (SB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14602.
